Mississippi, session 2026, HB1432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is created the Mississippi Legislative District Project Allocation Program, which shall be administered by the Department of Finance and Administration to provide funds for public-purpose projects in legislative districts of the members of the House of Representatives and the Senate within the limit of funds appropriated for the program.  Each member of the Legislature may designate one or more eligible projects within his or her district, subject to administrative review for legal and fiscal compliance. Each member of the House is eligible for annual district project funding in the amount of Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00), and each member of the Senate is eligible for annual district project funding in the amount of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00). (2)  Eligible uses for the funds may include, but shall not be limited to: (a)  Local infrastructure and public facility improvements; (b)  Public safety, emergency response, and disaster mitigation projects; (c)  Workforce development, education, and job training initiatives; (d)  Grants to governmental entities or nonprofit organizations domiciled in the State of Mississippi; and (e)  Environmental conservation, resiliency, and community enhancement projects. (3)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall review all project designations solely for compliance with applicable constitutional, statutory, and fiscal requirements.  Upon approval, the department shall disburse funds in accordance with state procurement, contracting, and grant administration laws.  No member of the Legislature shall exercise control over funds after project designation. (4)  The Department of Finance and Administration may promulgate rules, guidelines, and procedures necessary to administer the program, including documentation, certification, and reporting requirements to ensure transparency and accountability.  All expenditures shall be subject to audit by the Office of the State Auditor. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.